build/hi_desktop/engnoun.lexc
!!!engnoun.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] [Guess] +N +Sg +Pl +CON +3sg +GEN

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun
[Guess] Constant;
contact Ninf;
name Ninf;
first Ninf;
last Ninf;
one Ninf;
birthday Ninf;
today Ninf;

LEXICON Constant
[stem]+CON:0	#;
[stem]+CON+3sg+GEN:^'s	#;

LEXICON Ninf
[stem]+N+Sg:0   #;
[stem]+N+Pl:^s  #;
